Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Commercial loans for business or agricultural purposes. new text end new text begin For a financial institution that is an S corporation, the amount of income from a commercial loan is a subtraction if: new text end new text begin (1) the value of the loan is $5,000,000 or less; and new text end new text begin (2) the loan was provided to a person residing or located in this state and used primarily for a business or agricultural purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0134, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Commercial loans for business or agricultural purposes. new text end new text begin For a financial institution, the amount of income from a commercial loan is a subtraction if: new text end new text begin (1) the value of the loan is $5,000,000 or less; and new text end new text begin (2) the loan was provided to a person residing or located in this state and used primarily for a business or agricultural purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end